Utah statutes.
31A-4-104.   Bar on local activity by persons not authorized.

A person not qualified under Section 31A-4-102 to do an insurance business may not, from offices or by personnel or facilities located in Utah, solicit insurance applications or transact insurance business in another jurisdiction.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

